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LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

DTC C1721 / 21, C1723 /23 DampingForceControlActuator
Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
ECU sends a signal to damping force control actuator to drive the rotary valve of the shock absorber chang-
ing the shock absorber damping force.
The actuator is driven electromagnetically by step motor so that it can accurately follow the driving conditions
that change frequently.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1721 / 21 Whendetecting theovercurrentdetectioncondition (When
thecondition that thecurrentbetween theactuatordrive

SFrontdamping forcecontrolactuator
SFrontdamping forcecontrolactuatorcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

C1723 /23

the condition that the current between the actuator drive
terminalofECUandGNDis3.5 to6.0Aormorecontinued
for 1 ± 0.5msec.) 10 timescontinuously.

SReardamping forcecontrolactuator
SReardamping forcecontrolactuatorcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

HINT:
S CodeC 1721 / 21 corresponds to the frontdamping forcecontrolactuatorcircuit.
S CodeC 1723 /23corresponds to the reardamping forcecontrolactuatorcircuit.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the front or rear wheel damping force control actuator circuit, ECU prohibits the damping
force control after the ECU has returned the damping force of the other side wheel to the normal condition.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of damping force control actuator.

CHECK:
Using the same method as used for the ”DAMPING FORCE CONTROLLING CHECK” (See page DI−208),
bounce the vehicle and check that the shock absorber becoming harder.

OK Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).

NG

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between damping
force control actuator and suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check damping force control actuator.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the damping force control actuator connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between each terminal of damping force
control actuator.
OK:

Terminals 1 and 2 12.0 − 13.6 �

Terminals 2 and 3 12.0 − 13.6 �

Terminals 2 and 4 12.0 − 13.6 �

Terminals 2 and 5 12.0 − 13.6 �

NG Replace damping force control actuator.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).


